Massachusetts, session 194th, H1920.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11A of chapter 12 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new paragraphs:-
Whenever the division of civil rights and liberties believes that any person has engaged,
or is engaging, in any act or practice in violation of any law enforced by the division, or under
investigation by the division, the division may, prior to the commencement of any civil action,
issue in writing and cause to be served upon such person a civil investigative demand requiring
such person to produce for inspection and copying any documentary material, or other material
of whatever nature, that is relevant to the act or practice; to answer written interrogatories in
writing and under oath; to give oral testimony under oath; or to furnish any combination of such
material, answers or testimony.
A civil investigative demand issued pursuant to this section shall be subject to the
provisions set forth in paragraphs two through seven of section 6, and section 7, of chapter 93A;
of 4

provided, however, that the attorney general may, at her discretion, file a petition in the superior
court of Suffolk County to alter, amend, or waive any applicable provision as may be appropriate
to promote the public interest.
SECTION 2. Section 11I of said chapter 12 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by adding the following two paragraphs:-
Any aggrieved person who demonstrates by a preponderance of the evidence that any
violation of this section involved overt actions demonstrating, or was motivated in whole or part
by prejudice or bias based upon race, color, religion, national origin, ethnicity, immigration
status, sex, gender, gender expression, sexual orientation, gender identity, or disability may also
be awarded statutory damages in an amount up to $5,000.00 per violation, plus punitive damages
in an amount to be determined by the court. Further, the court may order such injunctive or other
equitable relief as it determines is appropriate, based upon the totality of the circumstances, to
promote the public interest and protect the peaceable exercise or enjoyment of rights secured by
the constitution or laws of the United States, and of rights secured by the constitution or laws of
the commonwealth, throughout the commonwealth. The injunctive and equitable relief available
under this paragraph shall be the same as in an action brought under section 11H. Violations of
injunctive terms granted in the public interest pursuant to this paragraph shall be enforceable
only through criminal and civil contempt.
Nothing in this section shall limit or restrict the Attorney General’s authority to bring any
action, or seek any relief, under section 11H or any other law.
SECTION 3. Chapter 22C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking section 33 and inserting in place thereof following section:-
of 4

Section 33. (a) The crime reporting unit shall quarterly obtain hate crime data from state,
local, and campus police, and other law enforcement agencies as well as hate crime information
and reports voluntarily produced by non law-enforcement entities such as community groups,
advocacy groups, and civil rights agencies. All police departments and law enforcement agencies
shall submit reports of hate crimes to the unit.
(b) The colonel shall promulgate regulations to standardize and centralize the submission
and collection of hate crime data. Said regulations shall include, but not be limited to, the
following: (1) establishment of a central repository for the collection and analysis of hate crime
data and, upon the establishment of such repository, the crime reporting unit shall be responsible
for collecting, analyzing, classifying and reporting such data, and shall maintain this information
in the central repository; (2) procedures necessary to ensure effective data-gathering and
preservation and protection of confidential information, and the disclosure of information in
accordance with section 35; (3) procedures for the solicitation, submission and acceptance of
hate crime incident reports and the information to be included in such reports by law
enforcement agencies, which shall include, but not be limited to, the demographic information of
the alleged offenders, the perceived protected characteristics for which the victims was targeted,
and the actual protected characteristics of the victims, if provided by the victims; (4) procedures
for assessing the credibility and accuracy of reports of hate crime data from law enforcement
agencies; and (5) procedures for the collection of hate crime information and reports voluntarily
produced by non law-enforcement entities such as community groups, advocacy groups, and
civil rights agencies.
of 4

SECTION 4. Section 34 of said chapter 22C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “shall” in line 3 the following words:- quarterly and
annually.
SECTION 5. Subsection (a) of section 39 of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as so
appearing, is hereby amended by striking the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the
following sentence:-
Whoever commits an assault or a battery upon a person or damages the real or personal
property of another with the intent to intimidate a person because of such person's race, color,
religion, national origin, ethnicity, immigration status, sex, gender, gender expression, sexual
orientation, gender identity, or disability shall be punished by a fine of not more than five
thousand dollars or by imprisonment in a house of correction for not more than two and one-half
years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
of 4